District of Columbia statutes.
3-1212.05

Individuals already practicing.

An individual who was engaged in practice as an assisted living administrator, athletic trainer, home health care administrator, personal fitness trainer, veterinary technician, veterinary euthanasia technician, audiology assistant, speech-language pathology assistant, or a speech-language pathology clinical fellow before March 26, 2014, may engage in that practice, regardless of whether that person is licensed, for a period of one year following March 26, 2014.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1205
as added Mar. 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 102(t), 61 DCR 1184
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-96 added this section.